Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB80.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.295 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The six (6) state comprehensive universities:
(a) Shall provide, upon approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education,
associate and baccalaureate programs of instruction;
(b) Shall provide, upon approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education,
graduate programs of instruction at the master's-degree level in education,
business, and the arts and sciences, specialist degrees, and programs beyond
the master's-degree level to meet the requirements for teachers, school
leaders, and other certified personnel; and
(c) Shall provide research and service programs directly related to the needs of
their primary geographical areas.
(2) A comprehensive university may provide:
(a) Programs of a community college nature in their own community comparable
to those listed for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, as
provided in KRS 164.580;
(b) Upon approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education, an advanced
practice doctoral program in nursing in compliance with KRS 314.111 and
314.131; and
(c) Upon approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education, one (1) or more
additional advanced practice doctoral programs.
(3) The Council on Postsecondary Education, in consultation with the Advisory
Conference of Presidents pursuant to KRS 164.021, shall develop criteria and
conditions upon which an advanced practice doctoral degree program may be
approved. The criteria shall include but not be limited to a determination of the
academic and workforce needs for a program, consideration of whether the program
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 9/6/2024 10:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 222
can be effectively delivered through a collaborative effort with an existing program
at another public university within the Commonwealth, and the capacity of a
university to effectively offer the program. A university requesting approval of an
advanced practice doctoral program shall be required to provide assurance that
funding for the program will not impair funding of any existing program at any
other public university.
(4) The council shall promulgate administrative regulations setting forth the agreed-on
criteria and conditions identified under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The council shall review advanced practice doctorates consistent with its review
schedule for all other academic programs.
(6) A comprehensive university shall not:
(a) Offer the terminal degrees of Doctor of Philosophy or Doctor of Musical Arts;
doctor's degrees required for professional practice and licensure in medicine,
veterinary medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, pharmacy, law, or optometry; or
the primary degree required for professional practice and licensure in
architecture. The existing school of law at Northern Kentucky University is
exempted from the requirements of this paragraph and Murray State
University may offer doctor's degrees required for professional practice and
licensure in veterinary medicine; or
(b) Describe itself in official publications or in marketing materials as a research
university or research institution. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed
as precluding a comprehensive university from conducting basic, applied, or
translational research.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 9/6/2024 10:11 AM Jacketed